Hawaii, session 2026, SB3183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's environmental commitments and goals necessitate the swift adoption of renewable energy.  Renewable energy systems that capture solar and wind energy and convert it to thermal or mechanical energy, electricity, and fuel will be key in the State's transition away from fossil fuels.  The legislature further finds that the renewable energy technologies income tax credit could be adjusted to better support low- and moderate‑income families by limiting the credit to taxpayers in those income brackets.  The legislature additionally finds that such changes would promote equitable access to clean energy and help offset federal actions taken to limit tax incentives for renewable energy, helping to protect hundreds of jobs in the State's energy industry. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the renewable energy technologies income tax credit by: (1)  For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, prohibiting taxpayers with an adjusted gross income of $250,000 or greater if filing as an individual or $350,000 or greater if filing jointly from claiming a credit for certain solar energy systems installed and placed in service on a single-family residential property; (2)  Limiting credit claims for certain solar energy systems for single-family residential property to two systems per single-family residential property and requiring systems to have a total output capacity of at least five kilowatts; (3)  Amending certain cap amounts for solar energy systems; and (4)  Increasing the adjusted gross income threshold below which an individual taxpayer may elect to have any excess of the credit over payments due refunded. SECTION 2.  Section 235-12.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§235-12.5  Renewable energy technologies; income tax credit.  (a) Each individual or corporate taxpayer that files an individual or corporate net income tax return for a taxable year may claim a tax credit under this section against the Hawaii state individual or corporate net income tax.  The tax credit may be claimed for every eligible renewable energy technology system that is installed and placed in service in the State by a taxpayer during the taxable year.  The tax credit may be claimed as follows: (1)  For each solar energy system:  thirty-five per cent of the actual cost or the cap amount determined in subsection [(b);] (c); provided that: (A)  For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2019, and except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), no tax credit may be claimed for a solar energy system that is five megawatts in total output capacity or larger and requires a power purchase agreement approved by the public utilities commission; (B)  A solar energy system that is five megawatts in total output capacity or larger, installed and placed in service pursuant to a power purchase agreement approved or pending approval by a decision and order by the public utilities commission [prior to] before December 31, 2019, shall continue to receive a tax credit equal to thirty-five per cent of the actual cost, or $500,000 per solar energy system that has a total output capacity of at least one thousand kilowatts per system of direct current, whichever is less; and (C)  For each solar energy system integrated with a pumped hydroelectric energy storage system, the tax credit may be claimed for thirty-five per cent of the actual cost or the cap amount determined in subsection [(b),] (c), whichever is less; provided that applicable project approval filings have been made to the public utilities commission by December 31, 2021; or (2)  For each wind-powered energy system:  twenty per cent of the actual cost or the cap amount determined in subsection [(b),] (c), whichever is less; provided further that multiple owners of a single system shall be entitled to a single tax credit; [and] provided further that the tax credit shall be apportioned between the owners in proportion to their contribution to the cost of the system. In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable is for every eligible renewable energy technology system that is installed and placed in service in the State by the entity.  The cost upon which the tax credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level.  Distribution and share of credit shall be determined pursuant to administrative rule. (b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, no taxpayer may claim a tax credit under this section for a solar energy system that is installed and placed in service on a single-family residential property unless the taxpayer's adjusted gross income is $250,000 or less if filing as an individual or $350,000 or less if filing jointly; provided that this income restriction shall not apply to any energy systems with the primary purpose of using energy from the sun to heat water for household use. [(b)] (c)  The amount of credit allowed for each eligible renewable energy technology system shall not exceed the applicable cap amount, which is determined as follows: (1)  If the primary purpose of the solar energy system is to use energy from the sun to heat water for household use, then the cap amounts shall be: (A)  $2,250 per system for single-family residential property; (B)  $350 per unit per system for multi-family residential property; and (C)  $250,000 per system for commercial property; (2)  For all other solar energy systems, the cap amounts shall be: (A)  $5,000 per system for single-family residential property; provided that [if]: (i)  If all or a portion of the system is used to fulfill the substitute renewable energy technology requirement pursuant to section 196-6.5(a)(3), the credit shall be reduced by thirty-five per cent of the actual system cost or $2,250, whichever is less; (ii)  A taxpayer may claim a credit for up to two systems per single-family residential property; and (iii)  Each system for which a credit is claimed shall have a total output capacity of at least five kilowatts; (B)  $350 per unit per system for multi-family residential property; and (C)  $500,000 per system for commercial property; and (3)  For all wind-powered energy systems, the cap amounts shall be: (A)  $1,500 per system for single-family residential property; provided that if all or a portion of the system is used to fulfill the substitute renewable energy technology requirement pursuant to section 196-6.5(a)(3), the credit shall be reduced by twenty per cent of the actual system cost or $1,500, whichever is less; (B)  $200 per unit per system for multi-family residential property; and (C)  $500,000 per system for commercial property. [(c)] (d)  For the purposes of this section: "Actual cost" means costs related to the renewable energy technology systems under subsection (a), including accessories and installation, but not including the cost of consumer incentive premiums unrelated to the operation of the system or offered with the sale of the system and costs for which another credit is claimed under this chapter. "Household use" means any use to which heated water is commonly put in a residential setting, including commercial application of those uses. "Renewable energy technology system" means a new system that captures and converts a renewable source of energy, such as solar or wind energy, into: (1)  A usable source of thermal or mechanical energy; (2)  Electricity; or (3)  Fuel. "Solar or wind energy system" means any identifiable facility, equipment, apparatus, or the like that converts solar or wind energy to useful thermal or electrical energy for heating, cooling, or reducing the use of other types of energy that are dependent upon fossil fuel for their generation. [(d)] (e)  For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, the dollar amount of any utility rebate shall be deducted from the cost of the qualifying system and its installation before applying the state tax credit. [(e)] (f)  The director of taxation shall prepare any forms that may be necessary to claim a tax credit under this section, including forms identifying the technology type of each tax credit claimed under this section, whether for solar or wind.  The director may also require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable information to ascertain the validity of the claim for credit made under this section and may adopt rules necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section pursuant to chapter 91. [(f)] (g)  If the tax credit under this section exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess of the credit over liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's income tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted, unless otherwise elected by the taxpayer pursuant to subsection [(g)] (h) or [(h).] (i).  All claims for the tax credit under this section, including amended claims, shall be filed on or before the end of the twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may be claimed.  Failure to comply with this subsection shall constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit. [(g)] (h)  For solar energy systems, a taxpayer may elect to reduce the eligible credit amount by thirty per cent and if this reduced amount exceeds the amount of income tax payment due from the taxpayer, the excess of the credit amount over payments due shall be refunded to the taxpayer; provided that tax credit amounts properly claimed by a taxpayer who has no income tax liability shall be paid to the taxpayer; [and] provided further that no refund on account of the tax credit allowed by this section shall be made for amounts less than $1. The election required by this subsection shall be made in a manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for the taxable year in which the system is installed and placed in service.  A separate election may be made for each separate system that generates a credit.  An election once made is irrevocable. [(h)] (i)  Notwithstanding subsection [(g),] (h), for any renewable energy technology system, an individual taxpayer may elect to have any excess of the credit over payments due refunded to the taxpayer, if: (1)  All of the taxpayer's income is exempt from taxation under section 235-7(a)(2) or (3); or (2)  The taxpayer's adjusted gross income is [$20,000] $40,000 or less (or [$40,000] $60,000 or less if filing a tax return as married filing jointly); provided that tax credits properly claimed by a taxpayer who has no income tax liability shall be paid to the taxpayer; [and] provided further that no refund on account of the tax credit allowed by this section shall be made for amounts less than $1. [A husband and wife] Spouses who do not file a joint tax return shall only be entitled to make this election to the extent that they would have been entitled to make the election had they filed a joint tax return. The election required by this subsection shall be made in a manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for the taxable year in which the system is installed and placed in service.  A separate election may be made for each separate system that generates a credit.  An election once made is irrevocable. [(i)] (j)  No taxpayer shall be allowed a credit under this section for the portion of the renewable energy technology system required by section 196-6.5 that is installed and placed in service on any newly constructed single-family residential property authorized by a building permit issued on or after January 1, 2010. [(j)] (k)  To the extent feasible, using existing resources to assist the energy-efficiency policy review and evaluation, the department shall assist with data collection on the following for each taxable year: (1)  The number of renewable energy technology systems that have qualified for a tax credit during the calendar year by: (A)  Technology type; and (B)  Taxpayer type (corporate and individual); and (2)  The total cost of the tax credit to the State during the taxable year by: (A)  Technology type; and (B)  Taxpayer type. [(k)] (l)  This section shall apply to eligible renewable energy technology systems that are installed and placed in service on or after July 1, 2009." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.